California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The department and the Department of Rehabilitation shall develop an interagency agreement, with respect to the delivery of habilitation services and vocational rehabilitation programs, to create an integrated employment services system between the Department of Rehabilitation and regional centers, with the goals of having each individual experience uninterrupted services, minimized handoffs, and fewer barriers, and increase timely access to employment. The interagency agreement shall outline an integrated employment services system to develop opportunities for, and increase access to, competitive integrated employment for individuals that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A dual provider process for employment
 providers between the Department of Rehabilitation and regional centers.

(2) Clear funding paths between the department, the Department of Rehabilitation, and regional centers to enable timely employment services access for each individual seeking employment.

(3) A process to make employment supports and services leading to competitive integrated employment seamless to the individual, regardless of which department an individual seeks supports from or which department funds the services.

(b) The department and the Department of Rehabilitation shall develop the interagency agreement no later than August 1, 2027.

(c) The department and the Department of Rehabilitation shall develop the integrated employment services system with input from the community no
 later than March 1, 2029. Input from the community shall include, but not be limited to, consultation with the department’s Lived Experience Advisory Group, individuals and families, caregivers, advocates and associations, service providers, regional centers, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the State Rehabilitation Council, and legislative staff.

(d) Beginning December 1, 2026, the department shall semiannually report milestones on the development of the integrated employment services system on the department’s internet website until the integrated employment services system is developed.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Dual provider process” means an aligned vendorization process for supported employment programs between regional centers and the Department of
 Rehabilitation.

(2) “Clear funding path” means an outline that defines funding obligations between regional centers and the Department of Rehabilitation for the different services used for an individual to achieve competitive integrated employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 47.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4869.

(a) (1) In furtherance of the purposes of this division to make services and supports available to enable persons with developmental disabilities to approximate the pattern of everyday living available to people without disabilities of the same age, to support the integration of persons with developmental disabilities into the mainstream life of the community, and to bring about more independent, productive, and normal lives for the persons served, it is the policy of the state that opportunities for integrated, competitive employment shall be given the highest priority for working age individuals with developmental disabilities, regardless of the severity of their disabilities. This policy shall be known as the Employment First Policy.

(2) Implementation of the policy shall be consistent with, and shall not infringe upon, the rights established pursuant to this division, including the right of people with developmental disabilities to make informed choices with respect to services and supports through the individual program planning process.

(3) Integrated competitive employment is intended to be the first option considered by planning teams for working age individuals, but individuals may choose goals other than integrated competitive employment.

(4) Postsecondary education, technical or vocational training, and internship programs may be considered as a means to achieve integrated competitive employment or career advancement.

(5) This chapter shall not be construed to expand the existing entitlement to services for persons with
 developmental disabilities described in this division.

(6) This chapter shall not alleviate schools of their responsibility to provide transition services to individuals with developmental disabilities.

(b) The State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall develop an informational brochure about the Employment First Policy, translate the brochure into various languages, and post the brochure on its Internet Web site.

(c) Regional centers shall provide consumers 16 years of age or older, and, when appropriate, their parents, legal guardians, conservators, or authorized representative with information, in an understandable form, about the Employment First Policy, options for integrated competitive employment, and services and supports, including postsecondary education, that are available to enable the consumer to
 transition from school to work, and to achieve the outcomes of obtaining and maintaining integrated competitive employment.

(d) The department may request information from regional centers on current and planned activities related to the Employment First Policy. A contract between the department and a regional center shall include performance objectives relating to implementation of the Employment First Policy, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 4629.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 18, Sec. 24.   (AB 107)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4870.

(a) To encourage competitive integrated employment opportunities statewide for individuals with developmental disabilities, the department shall establish guidelines and oversee a program, to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, to increase paid internship opportunities for individuals with developmental disabilities that produce outcomes consistent with the individual program plan. The department shall consult with the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, regional centers, employers, supported employment provider organizations, and clients’ rights advocates, to establish a program that shall be administered by community service providers and that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Internships shall not exceed
 1,040 hours per year for each individual placed in an internship.

(2) Payments for internship hours under this program shall include all required employer-related costs.

(3) Individuals participating in an internship shall be paid at or above minimum wage and equal to the customary wage paid by the employer for the same or similar work performed by individuals who do not have disabilities.

(4) A payment of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) shall be made to the regional center service provider if both of the following apply:

(A) On or after July 1, 2021, the regional center provider places an individual in a paid internship opportunity.

(B) That individual remains in the paid internship
 after 30 consecutive days.

(5) An additional payment of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be made to the regional center provider for an individual described in paragraph (4) who remains in the paid internship for 60 consecutive days.

(6) Placements shall be made into competitive, integrated work environments.

(7) Placements shall be made into internships that develop vocational skills that will facilitate paid employment opportunities in the future.

(8) Regional centers shall increase awareness of these internships to consumers outside of current employment programs through outreach to consumers once the program is implemented, as well as during the individual program plan process.

(b) The department shall require annual reporting by regional centers and vendors that ensures program accountability and achievement of program goals. This shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of interns placed who might not otherwise have achieved the placement absent this internship program.

(2) Types of employment in which interns are placed.

(3) Length of internships.

(4) Demographic information of interns.

(5) Amount of each intern placement payment.

(6) Employment-related supports provided by another agency or individual to the intern.

(7) Number of interns who subsequently entered paid employment, including salary and benefit information.

(8) Any additional information, as determined by the department.

(c) (1) The department shall include in its annual May Revision fiscal estimate a description of the implementation of the program, including, but not limited to, a description of the stakeholder consultation, the data described in subdivision (b), aggregated by regional center and statewide, and any recommendations for program changes that may be necessary or desirable to maximize program effectiveness and accountability.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amounts included in this section be considered for changes or adjustments as part of the budget
 process that develops the budget for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(d) Consistent with the individual program plan, the program shall increase sustained and appropriate competitive integrated employment placements by regional center service providers, as follows:

(1) A payment of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be made to the regional center service provider that, on or after July 1, 2016, places an individual into competitive integrated employment, and the individual is still competitively employed after 30 consecutive days, as described in subdivision (o) of Section 4851 and subdivision (d) of Section 4868.

(2) An additional payment of one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250) shall be made to the regional center service provider for an individual described in paragraph (1) who remains in competitive
 integrated employment for six consecutive months.

(3) An additional payment of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) shall be made to the regional center service provider for an individual described in paragraphs (1) and (2) who remains in competitive integrated employment for 12 consecutive months.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, effective July 1, 2021, until June 30, 2025, the competitive integrated employment incentive payments for each milestone shall be as follows:

(A) A payment of two thousand dollars ($2,000) if the individual is still engaged in competitive employment after 30 consecutive days, as described in subdivision (o) of Section 4851 and subdivision (d) of Section 4868.

(B) An additional payment of two thousand
 five hundred dollars ($2,500), if the individual in subparagraph (A) remains in competitive integrated employment for six consecutive months.

(C) An additional payment of three thousand dollars ($3,000), if the individual in subparagraph (B) remains in competitive integrated employment for 12 consecutive months.

(e) Regional centers shall annually report to the department the payments for placements pursuant to subdivision (d). The information shall be reported in a format determined by the department, and shall include the number of individuals placed in internships or other employment as described in this section each year.

(f) The payments made pursuant to this section shall not be in addition to the placement payments made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4860.

(g) Regional center service providers that place individuals into internships under subdivision (a) are not eligible for the employment placement incentives under this section, until the individual is transitioned into a competitive integrated employment placement that is not funded as an internship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 12, Sec. 15.   (AB 143)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4870.1.

(a) In addition to the program described Section 4870, subject to an appropriation in the Budget Act, the department shall establish, by December 31, 2021, a program to increase pathways to competitive integrated employment that shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) (A) Be developed in consultation with stakeholders as specified in subparagraph (B).

(B) Consultation with stakeholders pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall commence no later than September 30, 2021, and shall include individuals with disabilities, including those served by the program, family members, employers and provider association representatives, consumer advocates, disability
 provider representatives, including regional centers, members of the Developmental Services Task Force, and legislative staff.

(2) Provide contracts or grants for entities to develop and implement innovative and replicable strategies and practices to increase paid work experiences and employment opportunities for regional center consumers.

(b) The department shall include in its annual May Revision fiscal estimate a description of the implementation of the program including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of the stakeholder consultation.

(2) Data about the number and start date of funded grants or contracts.

(3) The number of enrolled participants.

(4) The number of employed participants.

(5) Any recommendations for program changes that may be necessary or desirable to maximize program effectiveness.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of written directives or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 53.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4870.2.

(a) In addition to the program described in Section 4870, subject to an appropriation in the Budget Act for this purpose, the department shall establish, by December 31, 2022, a three-year pilot program that focuses on competitive integrated employment, postsecondary education, and career readiness for individuals with developmental disabilities exiting work activity programs or secondary education in order to explore inclusive options, including, but not limited to, paid internships, competitive integrated employment, and college-to-career programs.

(b) The pilot program established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(1) Be developed in
 consultation with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, individuals with disabilities, including those who will be served by the program, family members, provider association representatives, consumer advocates, regional centers, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the State Department of Education, and the Department of Rehabilitation. The consultation described in this paragraph shall commence no later than August 31, 2022.

(2) Provide person-centered and time-limited services, aligning with each individual’s needs and a person-centered approach, focused on preparing individuals for career pathways.

(3) Consider evidence-based or promising practices for reducing or eliminating barriers to competitive integrated employment for people with intellectual and developmental disabilities in the development of innovated service options.

(4) Require service providers participating in the pilot program to report on defined outcome measures, as determined by the department.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of written directives or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 81.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Qualified ABLE Program [4875. - 4885.]

4875.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “ABLE account” or “account” means the account established for and owned by a designated beneficiary pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of meeting the qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary of the account.

(b) “Administrative fund” means the fund used to administer this chapter.

(c) “Board” means the California ABLE Act Board established under this chapter.

(d) “California ABLE Program Trust” or “ABLE program trust” means the trust created
 pursuant to this chapter.

(e) “CalABLE account” means an ABLE account that is established within the program established by this chapter and administered by the board.

(f) “Designated beneficiary” means the eligible individual for whom the ABLE account was established and who is the owner of the account.

(g) “Eligible individual” means an individual who is eligible under the program for a taxable year if blindness or disability occurred before the date on which the individual attained 46 years of age, and during that taxable year either of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The individual is entitled to benefits based on blindness or disability
 under Title II or XVI of the federal Social Security Act, and that blindness or disability occurred before the date on which the individual attained 46 years of age.

(2) A disability certification, as defined in the federal ABLE Act, with respect to the individual is filed pursuant to the requirements set forth in the federal ABLE Act.

(h) “Federal ABLE Act” means the federal Stephen Beck, Jr., Achieving a Better Life Experience Act of 2014 (as codified in Section 529A of Title 26 of the United States Code and amended through Public Law 117-328).

(i) “Investment management” means the functions performed by a manager contracted to perform functions delegated by the board.

(j) “Investment manager” means a manager contracted to perform functions delegated by the board.

(k) “Program fund” means the program fund established by this chapter, which shall be held as a separate fund within the California ABLE Program Trust.

(l) “Qualified ABLE Program” or “program” means the program established by this chapter to implement the federal ABLE Act pursuant to Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code.

(m) “Qualified disability expenses” means any expenses related to the eligible individual’s blindness or disability that are made for the benefit of an eligible individual who is the designated beneficiary, including the following expenses: education, housing, transportation,
 employment training and support, assistive technology and personal support services, health, prevention and wellness, financial management and administrative services, legal fees, expenses for oversight and monitoring, funeral and burial expenses, and other expenses, which are approved by the Secretary of the Treasury under regulations and consistent with the purposes
 of the federal ABLE Act.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed in (Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 324, Sec. 4.   (AB 339)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.

There is hereby created the California ABLE Act Board that consists of the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, the Controller, the Director of Developmental Services, the Chairperson of the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the Director of Rehabilitation, and the Chair of the State Independent Living Council, or their designees. The Treasurer shall serve as chair of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.   (SB 324)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4877.

(a) There is hereby created an instrumentality of the State of California to be known as the California ABLE Program Trust.

(b) The purposes, powers, and duties of the California ABLE Program Trust are vested in, and shall be exercised by, the board.

(c) The board, in the capacity of trustee, shall have the power and authority to do all of the following:

(1) Sue and be sued.

(2) (A) Make and enter into contracts necessary for the administration of the ABLE program trust, and engage
 personnel, including consultants, actuaries, managers, counsel, and auditors, as necessary for the purpose of rendering professional, managerial, and technical assistance and advice.

(B) Subdivision (a) of Section 10365.5 of the Public Contract Code shall not apply to a contract with a program consultant for the Qualified ABLE Program. Any contract with a program consultant for the Qualified ABLE Program that would have been prohibited by that subdivision shall be publicly disclosed in a manner specified by the board prior to entering into the contract.

(3) Adopt a corporate seal and change and amend it from time to time.

(4) Cause moneys in the program fund to be held and invested and reinvested.

(5) (A) Accept any grants, gifts, legislative appropriations, and other moneys from any unit of federal, state, or local government or any other person, firm, partnership, philanthropic entity, or corporation for deposit to the administrative fund or the program fund.

(B) The
 board may also target specific subgroups of eligible individuals, as described in paragraph (C), provided that they are not limited in such a way that would conflict with the intent of the Legislature in establishing the program or other applicable law.

(C) Grants, gifts, legislative appropriations, and other moneys may be used, to the extent permitted under federal and state law, to encourage eligible individuals to create an account or maximize account participation by engaging public awareness about the program. The board may partner with other public, private, or nonprofit entities to facilitate or administer such moneys.

(6) Enter into agreements with designated beneficiaries or eligible individuals to establish and maintain an ABLE account.

(7) Make provisions for the payment of costs of administration and operation of the ABLE program trust.

(8) Carry out the duties and obligations of the ABLE program trust pursuant to this chapter and the federal ABLE Act pursuant to Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code and federal regulations issued pursuant to that code, and have any other powers as may be reasonably necessary for the effectuation of the purposes, objectives, and provisions of this chapter.

(9) Carry out studies and projections in order to advise designated
 beneficiaries or eligible individuals regarding present and estimated future qualified disability expenses and the levels of financial participation in the ABLE program trust required in order to assist designated beneficiaries or eligible individuals.

(10) Participate in any other way in any federal, state, or local governmental program for the benefit of the ABLE program trust.

(11) Promulgate, impose, and collect administrative fees and charges in connection with transactions of the ABLE program trust, and provide for reasonable service charges, including penalties for cancellations.

(12) Set minimum and maximum investment levels.

(13) Administer the funds of the
 ABLE program trust.

(14) Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the property, assets, or activities of the ABLE program trust.

(15) Procure insurance indemnifying any member of the board from personal loss or liability resulting from a member’s action or inaction as a member of the board.

(d) The Treasurer shall, on behalf of the board, appoint an executive director, who shall not be a member of the board and who shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The Treasurer shall determine the duties of the executive director and other staff as necessary and set their compensation. The board may authorize the executive director to enter into contracts on behalf of the board or conduct any business necessary for
 the efficient operation of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 722, Sec. 2.   (AB 1076)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.

(a) The board shall segregate moneys received by the ABLE program trust into two funds, which shall be identified as the program fund and the administrative fund.

(1) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the program fund is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the ABLE Act Board for the purposes specified in this act.

(2) The moneys in the administrative fund shall be available for the ABLE Act Board, upon appropriation, for administration of the act.
 Administrative costs shall not exceed 3 percent of the incoming funds for each fiscal year for the first five fiscal years following the opening of the first ABLE Act account. After the five-year period, administrative costs shall not exceed 1 percent of the incoming funds for each fiscal year.

(3) Funding for startup and administrative costs for the board shall be provided in the form of a loan from the General Fund sufficient to cover the board’s projected administrative costs for its first two years of implementing the program. Once the loan has been expended and revenues from the program are sufficient to cover the board’s ongoing costs, the board shall repay, within five years, the amount loaned, plus interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(b) Not later than 30 days after the close of each month, the investment manager shall place on file for public inspection during business hours a report with respect to investment performance. The investment manager shall report the following information, to the extent applicable, to the board within 30 days following the end of each month:

(1) The type of investment, name of the issuer, date of maturity, and the par and dollar amount invested in each security, investment, and money within the program fund.

(2) The weighted average maturity of the investments within the program fund.

(3) Any amounts in the program fund that are under the management of an investment manager.

(4) The market value as of the date of the report and the source of this valuation for any security within the program fund.

(5) A description of the compliance with the statement of investment policy.

(c) Moneys in the program fund may be invested or reinvested by the Treasurer or may be invested in whole or in part under contract with an investment manager, as determined by the board.

(d) The board shall annually prepare and adopt a written statement of investment policy. The board shall consider the statement of investment policy and any changes in the investment policy at a public hearing. The board shall approve the investment management entity or entities
 consistent with subdivision (c).

(e) Transfers may be made from the program fund to the administrative fund for the purpose of paying operating costs associated with administering the ABLE program trust and as required by this chapter. All costs of administration of the ABLE program trust shall be paid out of the administrative fund.

(f) All moneys paid by designated beneficiaries or eligible individuals in connection with ABLE accounts shall be deposited as received into the program fund, and shall be promptly invested and accounted for separately. Deposits and interest thereon accumulated on behalf of designated beneficiaries in the program fund of the ABLE program trust may be used for qualified disability expenses.

(g) The board shall maintain separate accounting for each designated beneficiary.

(h) Any designated beneficiary may, directly or indirectly, direct the investment of any contributions to his or her ABLE account, or any earnings thereon, no more than two times in any calendar year.

(i) The assets of the trust, including the program fund, shall at all times be preserved, invested, and expended solely and only for the purposes of the trust and shall be held in trust for the designated beneficiaries and no property rights therein shall exist in favor of the state. The assets shall not be transferred or used by the state for any purposes other than the purposes of the trust and consistent with the provisions of the federal ABLE Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 774, Sec. 5.   (AB 449)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.

(a) Under the program, a person may make contributions for a taxable year, for the benefit of an individual who is an eligible individual for that taxable year, to an ABLE account that is established for the purpose of meeting the qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary of the account if both of the following criteria are met:

(1) The designated beneficiary is limited to one ABLE account for purposes of this chapter.

(2) The ABLE account is established only for a designated beneficiary who is a resident of the United States.

(b) A contribution shall not be accepted if either of the following occurs:

(1) The contribution is not in cash.

(2) Except in the case of contributions under Section 529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to change in designated beneficiaries or programs, or received in a qualified ABLE rollover contribution described in Section 530A(d)(4)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE rollover contributions, the contribution to an ABLE account would result in aggregate contributions from all contributors to the ABLE account for the taxable year exceeding the amount of both of the following:

(A) The amount allowed under Section 2503(b) of the Internal
 Revenue Code, relating to exclusion from gifts, for the calendar year in which the taxable year begins.

(B) In the case of any contribution by a designated beneficiary described in Section 529A(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code before January 1, 2026, the lesser of either of the following:

(i) Compensation, as defined by Section 219(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, includible in the designated beneficiary’s gross income for the taxable year.

(ii) An amount equal to the poverty line for a one-person household as promulgated under Section 9902(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, for the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the taxable year begins.

(c) The designated beneficiary shall retain ownership of all contributions made to
 the designated beneficiary’s ABLE account to the date of utilization for qualified disability expenses, and all interest derived from the investment of the contributions to the designated beneficiary’s ABLE account shall be deemed to be held in the ABLE program trust for the benefit of the designated beneficiary. Neither the contributions, nor any interest derived therefrom, may be pledged as collateral for any loan.

(d) The board shall develop adequate safeguards to prevent aggregate contributions on behalf of a designated beneficiary in excess of the maximum contribution limits necessary to provide for the qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary. For purposes of this subdivision, aggregate contributions include contributions under any prior qualified ABLE program of any state or agency or instrumentality thereof but do not include any contributions received in a qualified ABLE rollover contribution described in Section 530A(d)(4)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE rollover contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 10.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4880.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, moneys in, contributions to, and any distribution for qualified disability expenses from, an ABLE account, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), shall not count toward determining eligibility for a state or local means-tested program.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), Section 103 of Division B of Public Law 113-295 and Sections 17140.4 and 23711.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall apply.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, moneys in an ABLE account, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), shall be exempt from enforcement of a money judgment without making a claim.

(2) A money judgment in favor of the State Department of Health Care Services shall not be subject to the exemption provided in paragraph (1) during any period of time in which federal law or guidance issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services requires the department to recover funds from ABLE accounts for reimbursement of qualifying Medi-Cal expenditures.

(d) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1.5) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 529, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 688)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative September 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4881.

(a) The board shall provide an annual listing of distributions to individuals with respect to an interest in an ABLE account to the Franchise Tax Board at a time and in a manner and form as specified by the Franchise Tax Board. The taxpayers’ identification numbers obtained in connection with an ABLE account shall be used exclusively for state and federal tax administration purposes.

(b) The board shall make a report to the appropriate individual of any distribution to any individual with respect to an interest in an ABLE account, at a time and in a form and manner as required by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) The board shall report annually to each designated beneficiary all of the following:

(1) The value of the designated beneficiary’s account.

(2) The interest earned thereon.

(3) The rate of return of the investments in the designated beneficiary’s account for that reporting period.

(4) Information on investments and qualified disability expenses that designated beneficiaries can use to set savings goals and contribution amounts.

(d) The board shall provide a means for designated beneficiaries to express concerns or comments regarding the ABLE program trust and any information required
 to be reported by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.   (SB 324)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4882.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations as it deems necessary to implement this chapter consistent with the federal Internal Revenue Code and regulations issued pursuant to that code to ensure that this program meets all criteria for federal tax-exempt benefits.

(b) The board may adopt regulations to implement this chapter as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of the regulations shall be
 deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 774, Sec. 7.   (AB 449)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4883.

This act shall be construed liberally in order to effectuate its legislative intent. The purposes of this act and all of its provisions with respect to powers granted shall be broadly interpreted to effectuate the intent and purposes of the federal ABLE Act and not as a limitation of those powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.   (SB 324)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4884.

The board shall market this program to residents of the United States to the extent funds are available to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 470, Sec. 3.   (AB 384)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4885.

(a) Notwithstanding any other state law, and only to the extent permitted under federal law, the program may permit a change in the designated beneficiary of an ABLE account, made during the life of the designated
 beneficiary, to take effect upon the death of the designated beneficiary. The amount to be transferred pursuant to the successor beneficiary designation is subject to all of the relevant payment and tax provisions of the federal ABLE Act.

(b) Following the death of a designated beneficiary, and only after the State Department of Health Care Services has
 received approval by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, both of the following shall apply:

(1) For CalABLE accounts established on or after January 1, 2023, the following shall apply:

(A) The state shall not seek recovery pursuant to Section 14009.5 of any amount remaining in a designated
 beneficiary’s
 CalABLE account for any amount of medical assistance paid for the designated beneficiary after the establishment of the account under the state’s Medicaid plan established under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

(B) The state shall not file a claim for any amount remaining in a designated beneficiary’s CalABLE account for the payment under subdivision (f) of Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) For CalABLE accounts and ABLE accounts established prior to January 1, 2023:

(A) The state shall not seek recovery pursuant to Section 14009.5 of any amount remaining in a designated beneficiary’s CalABLE or ABLE account for any amount of medical assistance paid for the designated beneficiary after the establishment of the account under the state’s Medicaid plan established under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

(B) The state shall not file a claim for any amount remaining in a designated beneficiary’s CalABLE or ABLE account for the payment under subdivision (f) of Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 896, Sec. 3.   (AB 2216)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 16. Grievance Process [4890. - 4894.]

4890.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Authorized representative” has the same meaning as in Section 4701.

(b) “Case file” means information or documentation provided by the grievant, and information or documentation considered, relied upon, and generated by the regional center or state-operated facility related to the grievance.

(c) “Day” means a calendar day.

(d) (1) “Grievance” means either of the following:

(A) An expression of
 dissatisfaction related to the regional center, service provider, or state-operated facility’s performance of the activities described in Section 441.301(c)(1) to 441.301(c)(6) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or an individual’s rights described in Sections 4502, 4502.1 and 4503.

(B) A belief that, for a person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), a right described in Sections 4502, 4502.1, or 4503 has been abused, punitively withheld, or improperly or unreasonably denied by a regional center, service provider, or state-operated facility.

(2) For the purposes of this chapter, “grievance” does not include disagreements regarding eligibility for and the provision of services to which Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700) applies, or regarding rates or audit appeals for which there is an appeals procedure established in regulations. This chapter does not
 limit rights under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700).
